Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 61 Military Forces
12-61-206. Assemblies, annual training, and other duties.

Members and units of the National Guard shall assemble for drill or other equivalent training, instruction, or duties during each year and shall participate in field training, encampments, maneuvers, schools, conferences, or other similar duties each year as may be prescribed by the laws of the United States and of the state and the regulations and rules issued thereunder. However, no assembly of any such unit of the organized militia shall be ordered in time of peace for any day during which a general election shall be held, except in case of riot, invasion, or insurrection or imminent danger thereof.

Within the amount appropriated therefor, the Adjutant General may prescribe and order the number of days, if any, for assemblies or drills or other equivalent training, instruction, or duties to be performed annually by members of the National Guard for which they may receive pay and allowances.

Within the amount appropriated therefor, the Adjutant General may prescribe and order the number of days, if any, of field training, encampments, maneuvers, schools, conferences, or other similar duties to be performed by members of the National Guard for which they may receive pay and allowances.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 25; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-205; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 929.

12-61-207. Female members.

The Governor may appoint, commission, and enlist female citizens of the state into the National Guard where the laws and regulations of the United States permit. While so serving, they will have the same status as male members of the military forces.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-206.

Subchapter 3

— State Defense Force

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 1985, No. 670, § 11: Apr. 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain disciplinary provisions of the state military code need to be strengthened; that this act results in the same and should be given effect prior to the 1985 annual training of the military personnel subject to the state military code; that April 1 is a reasonable date to expect that this act will have been passed by both houses and acted upon by the Governor and that a date certain is desirable for the effective date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after April 1, 1985.”

12-61-301. Authority for calling.

The Arkansas State Defense Force may be called to active duty at the discretion of the Governor, when any part of the Arkansas National Guard shall have been called or ordered into federal service, or in any other emergency when the Governor shall deem it necessary to supplement the Arkansas National Guard.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 40; 1985, No. 670, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-501; Acts 1989, No. 283, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. In amending this subchapter, Acts 1989, No. 283, changed the name of the Arkansas State Guard to the Arkansas State Defense Force.

12-61-302. Organization and government.

The Arkansas State Defense Force shall be organized and governed by the terms of this code and by such rules as may be promulgated from time to time.

Except when otherwise provided, all provisions of this code and rules in respect to the Arkansas National Guard shall apply to the Arkansas State Defense Force.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 41; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-502; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 930.

12-61-303. Duties, privileges, etc.

All duties imposed and all provisions relating to the privileges, immunities, and prohibitions of the Arkansas National Guard shall likewise apply to the Arkansas State Defense Force.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 42; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-503.

12-61-304. Commander.

When organized for active state duty, the Arkansas State Defense Force shall be commanded by any general officer holding an Arkansas state commission, in a rank not above brigadier general, who shall be appointed by the Governor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 43; 1985, No. 670, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-504; Acts 1989, No. 283, § 2.

12-61-305. Assignments.

All officers and enlisted personnel of the organized militia not otherwise assigned may be assigned to the Arkansas State Defense Force for such time and in such manner as prescribed by rules promulgated by the Governor as he or she deems necessary.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 44; 1985, No. 670, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-505; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 931.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

12-61-306. Discharge and release.

Upon the release of officers and enlisted personnel from the Arkansas State Defense Force, they shall resume the status held by them prior to their activation.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 45; 1985, No. 670, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-506; Acts 1989, No. 283, § 3.